Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 10 Allowances to Families of Decedents

33-10-1.
Wearing apparel and exempt personal property allowed to widow or widower and children.

The wearing apparel of the surviving spouse and minor children of a decedent shall belong to them, respectively. The surviving spouse shall be entitled, individually and for the family under her or his care, to such furniture, furnishings, household effects, supplies, and, in addition thereto, such other personal property of the decedent exempt from attachment by law, as the probate court shall deem necessary, having regard to all the circumstances of the case; or, if there is no surviving spouse, the minor children shall be entitled to the furniture, furnishings, household effects, or the use thereof, in such manner as the court shall direct.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 871; G.L. 1909, ch. 313, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 364, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 577, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

33-10-1

; P.L. 1980, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 260, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 312, § 2.

33-10-2.
Property allowed not assets in hands of executor or administrator.

Such part of the decedent’s personal property as the court shall allow to the decedent’s surviving spouse or family, although inventoried, shall not be assets in the hands of the decedent’s personal representative.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 873; G.L. 1909, ch. 313, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 364, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 577, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

33-10-2

; P.L. 1980, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 260, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 312, § 2.

33-10-3.
Allowances for temporary support of family.

The probate court shall make reasonable allowance out of the decedent’s probate estate for the support of his or her family, until the support can otherwise be provided for, for a period not exceeding six (6) months from the date of the death, having regard to the situation of the family and the value and circumstances of the estate. The allowance may be fixed at any time upon application of the personal representative, or of any party in interest, filed within six (6) months after the first publication of notice of the qualification of the personal representative. The court may, in its discretion, provided a final account has not been allowed, make an additional allowance under like conditions for the support of the family for a second period not exceeding six (6) months, the allowance to be fixed at any time after the first six-month (6) period has passed and within one year after the first publication of notice of the qualification of the personal representative upon application, of the personal representative or of any party in interest. After exhausting the personal property, real estate may be sold to provide the amount of allowance decreed in the same manner as for the payment of debts. An appeal from a decree granting letters testamentary or of administration shall not prevent the allowance being made by the probate court or the payment thereof. An appeal from a decree making any allowance shall not prevent the payment of the allowance if a bond in such amount as may be fixed by the court, but no less than the amount of the allowance be given to the court by a surviving spouse, if any, or by a guardian of the minor children in case there be no surviving spouse, with surety or sureties approved by the court, and conditioned to repay all in excess of what is finally determined to be a reasonable allowance or to return all of the allowance in case the decree granting the allowance is finally reversed in the full amount. The bond required by the provisions of this section and the remedies thereon shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 17 of this title as far as the context thereof permits.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 872; G.L. 1909, ch. 313, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 364, § 7; P.L. 1926, ch. 827, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 577, § 7; P.L. 1941, ch. 1004, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-10-3

; P.L. 1962, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 260, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 312, § 2.

Parties to Appeal.

Executor could appeal from decree of probate court granting allowance under this section where executor was also trustee of substantial portion of testator’s estate and claim of appeal set forth interests both as executor and as trustee. Rhode Island Hosp. Trust Co. v. Hopkins,

38 R.I. 59

, 94 A. 724,

1915 R.I. LEXIS 49

(1915).

33-10-4.
Real estate set aside for support of widow or widower in addition to statutory life estate.

If there be no issue of a deceased person living at the time of his or her death, the probate court shall also allow and set off to the widow or widower such portion of the real estate of her or his deceased spouse not required for the payment of his or her debts as may be suitable for her or his situation and support and in accordance with the circumstances of the estate, and the widow or widower shall hold the real estate in addition to those rights afforded by chapter 25 of this title subject to the same conditions and for the same time as she or he holds her or his statutory estate pursuant to the provisions of chapter 25 of this title.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 874; G.L. 1909, ch. 313, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 364, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 577, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

33-10-4

; P.L. 1980, ch. 317, § 1.